Hawaii statutes.
§142-65 On uncultivated land. If any
of the animals mentioned in section 142-63 trespasses on any properly fenced
uncultivated land, the owner of the animals shall pay upon proof, the full
amount of the damage or loss to the landowner or to any person in possession of
the land, whoever suffers the damage or loss. [L 1907, c 125, §14; RL 1925,
§702; RL 1935, §280; RL 1945, §1086; RL 1955, §20-64; HRS §142-65; am L 1975, c
40, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next